Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
85-2419
Final commission action; appeal.

Any person
aggrieved or adversely affected by any final commission action may appeal
such action. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 19.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.